Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB415.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 76 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FRANSOMWARESec.7671. Purposes of subchapter.7672. Definitions.7673. Prohibited actions.7674. (Reserved). 7675. Forfeiture.7676. Limitation of time.7677. Notification.7678. Payments.12345678910111213141516171819 7679. Civil actions.7680. Remedies not exclusive.7681. Office of Administration.§ 7671. Purposes of subchapter.This subchapter is intended to ensure that Commonwealth agencies have strong capabilities in place to:(1) Prohibit persons from engaging in ransomware attacks and from extorting payments to resolve or prevent ransomware attacks.(2) Prevent and detect ransomware attacks.(3) Restore systems and captured information quickly that were disrupted or obtained through ransomware attacks.(4) Provide timely public notification of ransomware attacks.(5) Pursue and prosecute perpetrators of ransomware attacks.§ 7672. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." Any of the following:(1) The Governor's Office.( 2) A department, board, commission, authority or other agency of the Commonwealth that is subject to the policy supervision and control of the Governor.(3) The office of Lieutenant Governor.(4) An independent department.(5) An independent agency.(6) The General Assembly or an agency of the General Assembly.20250SB0415PN0368 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Computer contaminant." A set of computer instructions that is designed to modify, damage, destroy, record or transmit data held by a computer, computer system or computer network without the intent or permission of the owner of the data."Independent agency." A board, commission, authority or other agency of the Commonwealth that is not subject to the policy supervision and control of the Governor."Independent department." Any of the following:(1) The Department of the Auditor General. (2) The Treasury Department.(3) The Office of Attorney General.(4) A board or commission of an entity under paragraph (1), (2) or (3)."Managed service provider." A third-party company that remotely manages a customer's information technology infrastructure and end-user systems."Ransomware." As follows:(1) A computer contaminant or lock placed or introduced without authorization into a computer, computer system or computer network that does any of the following:(i) Restricts access by an authorized person to the computer, computer system or computer network or to any data held by the computer, computer system or computer network , under circumstances in which the person responsible for the placement or introduction of the computer contaminant or lock demands payment of money or other consideration to:(A) remove the computer contaminant or lock;(B) restore access to the computer, computer system, computer network or data; or20250SB0415PN0368 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) otherwise remediate the impact of the computer contaminant or lock.(ii) Transforms data held by the computer, computer system or computer network into a form in which the data is rendered unreadable or unusable without the use of a confidential process or key.(2) The term does not include authentication required to upgrade or access purchased content or the blocking of access to subscription content in the case of nonpayment for the access.§ 7673. Prohibited actions.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a person may not, with the intent to extort money or other thing of value from another person or a Commonwealth agency for the purpose of removing a computer contaminant or lock, restoring access to a computer, computer system, computer network or data or otherwise remediating the impact of a computer contaminant or lock:(1) Knowingly possess ransomware . (2) Use ransomware without the authorization of the owner of the computer, computer system or computer network.(3) Sell, transfer or develop ransomware.(4) Threaten to use ransomware against another person or a Commonwealth agency if the threat is:(i) made in an express or implied manner; and(ii) transmitted in person, by mail or through facsimile, email, the Internet, a telecommunication device or other electronic means.(5) Induce another person to commit an act described in paragraph (1), (2), (3) or (4).20250SB0415PN0368 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Exception.--Subsection (a) does not apply to the use of ransomware for research purposes by an authorized agent of the Commonwealth or the Federal Government.(c) Grading.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the following apply:(i) An offense under this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the second degree.(ii) If the aggregate amount of money or other thing of value involved is less than $10,000, the offense constitutes a misdemeanor of the first degree.(iii) If the aggregate amount of money or other thing of value involved is $10,000 or more but less than $100,000, the offense constitutes a felony of the third degree.(iv) If the aggregate amount of money or other thing of value involved is $100,000 or more but less than $500,000, the offense constitutes a felony of the second degree.(v) If the aggregate amount of money or other thing of value involved is at least $500,000, the offense constitutes a felony of the first degree.(2) The grading of an offense under subsection (a)(1), (2) or (3) shall be increased one degree if the commission of the offense:(i) is a second or subsequent offense;(ii) involves the infliction of a physical injury; or(iii) involves a computer, computer system or computer network, or any data held by the computer, 20250SB0415PN0368 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 computer system or computer network, of a court or agency of the unified judicial system.§ 7674. (Reserved).§ 7675. Forfeiture.(a) Authorization.--Any computer, computer system, computer network, software or data that is used during the commission of an offense under this subchapter or used as a repository for the storage of software or data illegally obtained in violation of this subchapter shall be subject to forfeiture.(b) Procedures.--The forfeiture under this section shall be conducted in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 5803 (relating to asset forfeiture), 5805 (relating to forfeiture procedure), 5806 (relating to motion for return of property), 5807 (relating to restrictions on use), 5807.1 (relating to prohibition on adoptive seizures) and 5808 (relating to exceptions).§ 7676. Limitation of time.An action to prosecute an offense under this subchapter must be commenced within three years from the date of discovery of the commission of the offense.§ 7677. Notification.(a) Managed service providers.--A managed service provider of information technology in the service of a Commonwealth agency shall notify an appropriate official of the Commonwealth agency of the discovery of ransomware or receipt of a ransomware demand within one hour of the discovery of ransomware or receipt of the ransomware demand.(b) Commonwealth agencies.--(1) Within two hours of a Commonwealth agency's discovery of ransomware or receipt of a ransomware demand, the Commonwealth agency shall, as necessary and appropriate, 20250SB0415PN0368 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notify the Pennsylvania State Police and the head of the impacted agency of the discovery of ransomware or receipt of a ransomware demand.(2) If a Commonwealth agency or managed service provider is in receipt of a ransomware demand, the Pennsylvania State Police shall, within 24 hours of the notification by the Commonwealth agency of the ransomware demand, notify an appropriate official of the Federal Bureau of Investigation of the ransomware demand.§ 7678. Payments.(a) Public money.--After December 31, 2025, State and local taxpayer money or other public money may not be used to pay an extortion attempt involving ransomware.(b) Insurance coverage.--Nothing in this section shall prohibit a Commonwealth agency from expending public money for the purposes of purchasing or maintaining insurance coverage for ransomware attacks, including the payment of any deductible or coinsurance by the Commonwealth agency that is required under the terms of the insurance policy. The following apply:(1) The Commonwealth agency may not use public money designated for insurance coverage to pay an extortion attempt involving ransomware.(2) Subject to paragraph (1), public money designated for insurance coverage may be used to pay costs associated with:(i) the recovery and restoration of systems and captured information as a result of a ransomware attack;(ii) public notification regarding a ransomware attack;(iii) identity theft protection for persons affected 20250SB0415PN0368 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by a ransomware attack; and(iv) other related expenses involving a ransomware attack.§ 7679. Civil actions.A person or Commonwealth agency that is a victim of an offense under this subchapter may bring an action against a person violating this subchapter to recover any one or more of the following:(1) Actual damages.(2) Punitive damages.(3) Reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred.§ 7680. Remedies not exclusive.The commencement of a criminal prosecution or civil action under this subchapter shall not prohibit or limit the commencement of a criminal prosecution or civil action under any other law.§ 7681. Office of Administration.(a) Study.--The Office of Administration shall st udy the susceptibility, preparedness and ability to respond on the part of Commonwealth agencies to ransomware attacks. In conducting the study, the Office of Administration shall:(1) Develop guidelines and best practices to prevent a ransomware attack.(2) Evaluate current data encryption and backup strategies.(3) Evaluate the availability of tools to monitor unusual access requests, computer viruses and computer network traffic.(4) Develop guidelines for Commonwealth agencies on 20250SB0415PN0368 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 responding to a ransomware attack.(5) Develop a coordinated law enforcement response strategy that uses forensic investigative techniques to identify the source of a ransomware attack.(6) Provide recommendations on legislative or regulatory action to protect Commonwealth agencies from a ransomware attack.(b) Reports.-- The Office of Administration shall prepare and transmit to the General Assembly a report by July 1 of each year, which must include the following:(1) The information specified under subsection (a), including any updates on policies and procedures regarding ransomware.(2) The number of ransomware attacks against Commonwealth agencies during the period covered by the report, including:(i) The nature and extent of the ransomware and extortion attempts involving ransomware.(ii) The effect of the ransomware attacks.(3) Any other information that the Office of Administration deems necessary or proper.(c) Cooperation.--A Commonwealth agency shall cooperate with the Office of Administration in providing information necessary for the preparation of a report under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0415PN0368 - 9 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425